Hawaii, session 2025, SB1085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a) There is established a pilot program within the department of agriculture to determine feasibility and prepare an environmental impact statement for the drilling of non-potable water wells on individual parcels at Panaewa agricultural park and Panaewa farm lots. (b)  The department of agriculture shall consult and coordinate with the department of Hawaiian home lands on the location and distribution of water from the non-potable water wells before and after the completion of the environmental impact statement to drill non-potable water wells on individual parcels at Panaewa agricultural park and Panaewa farm lots. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the preparation of an environmental impact statement for the drilling of non-potable water wells on individual parcels at Panaewa agricultural park and Panaewa farm lots. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.